Georgia, session 2025_26, HB622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing a new charter for the City of Hoboken, Georgia, approved March 24, 1976
(Ga. L. 1976, p. 3060), as amended, is amended by revising Section 2.04 as follows:
"SECTION 2.04.
Compensation and expenses.
The mayor shall receive as compensation for his or her services $475.00 per month. Each
councilmember shall receive as compensation for his or her services $175.00 per month.
The mayor and councilmembers shall also be entitled to be reimbursed for their actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties."
H. B. 622
- 1 -

LC 47 3214/AP
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 622
- 2 -